Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 418.976 is amended to read:
418.976. As used in ORS 418.976 to 418.981, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Agency of state government” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.111.
[(1)] (2)  “Cultural competence”  means accepting and respecting diversity and differences in a
continuous process of self-assessment and reflection on  one’s personal and organizational percep-
tions of the dynamics of culture.
[(2)] (3)  “Cultural responsiveness” means the process by which people and systems respond  re-
spectfully  and effectively to individuals of all cultures, languages, classes, races, ethnic backgrounds,
disabilities, religions, genders, sexual orientations and  other diversity factors in a manner that re-
cognizes, affirms and values the worth of individuals, families and  communities, and that protects
and preserves the dignity of each.
[(3)] (4) “Family” includes, with respect to a youth:
(a) A biological or legal parent;
(b) A sibling;
(c) An individual related by blood, marriage or adoption;
(d) A foster parent;
(e) A legal guardian;
(f) A caregiver;
(g) An individual with a significant social relationship with the youth;
(h) Any person who provides support to the youth that the youth identifies as important; and
(i) Any person identified by the youth as being family.
(5) “Participating state agency” means a state officer, board,  commission, department,
institution, branch or agency of state government  whose costs are paid wholly or in part
from funds held in the State Treasury and who:
(a) Is identified by the  System of Care Advisory Council as a provider of services and
supports that are part of the state system of care; or
(b) Provides services or resources to the council.
[(4)] (6)  “Services and supports” means public, private and community resources that  assist
youth in the achievement of positive outcomes, including but not limited to education, child  welfare,
public health, primary care,  pediatric care, juvenile justice, mental health treatment, substance use
treatment and services for individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities.
Enrolled Senate Bill 4 (SB 4-A) Page 1
[(5)] (7) “System of care” means a coordinated network of services and supports to youth that:
(a) Integrates care planning and management across multiple levels of care;
(b) Recognizes disability as a natural and healthy part of the human experience;
(c) Is culturally and linguistically competent;
(d) Is designed to build meaningful partnerships with families and youth in the delivery  and
management of services and the development of policy;
(e) Has a supportive policy and management infrastructure at the state and local levels; and
(f) Is community-based with relationships at the local level.
[(6)] (8) “Youth” means an individual 25  years of age or younger who has, or is at increased risk
of developing, chronic behavioral, emotional, physical or developmental conditions and is under  the
supervision of or engaged with two or more systems of care.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 418.978 is amended to read:
418.978. (1) A commission known as the System of Care Advisory Council is established.
(2) The council consists of 25 members appointed as follows:
(a) The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall  appoint one representative from the Judicial
Department.
(b) The Governor shall appoint:
(A) Two members who are representatives of  the Department of Human Services with extensive
knowledge of systems of care, one of whom must have direct experience with intellectual  and de-
velopmental disabilities programs.
(B) One member who is a representative  of the Oregon Youth Authority with extensive know-
ledge of systems of care.
(C) One member who  is a representative of the Oregon Health Authority with extensive know-
ledge of systems of care.
(D) One member who is a representative of the Department of Education.
(E) Two members  who are representatives of coordinated care organizations meeting the criteria
adopted by the  Oregon Health Authority under ORS 414.572, at least one of which must provide
services to rural communities.
(F) One  psychiatrist, one psychologist and one pediatric physician, each of whom must have
clinical experience with youth.
(G) One member who is a representative of an entity that offers commercial insurance.
(H) Three members who are representatives of agencies  that provide different services and
supports to youth and families of youth.
(I) One member who is a representative of organizations that advocate for youth.
(J) One member who is a representative of organizations that advocate for families of youth.
(K) Two members of the public, each of whom are family members of:
(i) Persons with intellectual or developmental disabilities or mental illness; or
(ii) Persons  who are currently or were previously in the foster care system or the youth criminal
justice system.
(L) Two members of the public who are no more than 25 years of age and who:
(i) Are persons with intellectual or developmental disabilities or mental illness; or
(ii) Are currently or were previously  a ward, youth or youth offender, as those terms are defined
in ORS 419A.004.
(M) One member who is a county juvenile department director.
(N) One member who is a county mental health program director.
(O) One member who  is a member of a federally recognized Indian tribe in this state or a
designee of the Indian tribe.
(P) One member who is a representative of Oregon’s federally mandated disability protection and
advocacy agency.
(3) The term of office of each member of the council is  four years, but a member serves at the
pleasure of the  appointing authority. Before the expiration of the term of a member, a successor
shall be appointed whose term begins on January 2 next following. A  member is eligible for reap-
Enrolled Senate Bill 4 (SB 4-A) Page 2
pointment to one additional term. If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall
make an appointment to become immediately effective for the unexpired term.
(4)(a) Members of the council who are not  state employees are not entitled to compensation or
reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on the council.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, members  of the council described in sub-
section (2)(b)(K) and (L) of this section may be  reimbursed for travel and other reasonable expenses
associated with serving on the council.
(5) Members of the council who are state employees carrying out their state  employment func-
tions are entitled to compensation and reimbursement by their employing  agencies for actual and
necessary travel and  other expenses incurred by them in the performance of their official duties as
members of the council.
(6) The  Governor shall appoint one of the members as chairperson, to serve at the pleasure of
the Governor. The members of the council shall elect from among themselves a vice chairperson
who shall preside over  meetings and exercise the functions of the chairperson during the absence
or disability of the chairperson. The chairperson and the vice chairperson shall execute the  duties
determined by the council to be necessary.
(7) The council shall appoint an executive director  who shall be in the exempt service and
who shall be responsible for  the performance of duties assigned by the council. Subject to
the State Personnel Relations Law, the executive director may employ appropriate staff to
carry out the duties assigned by the council.
[(7)] (8) The council  shall meet at least four times per year at a place, day and hour determined
by the council.
[(8)] (9)  A majority of the  members of the council constitutes a quorum for the transaction of
business.
[(9) The Oregon Health Authority, in coordination with the Department of Human Services, shall
provide staff support to the council. ]
SECTION 3.
 ORS 418.979 is amended to read:
418.979. (1) The purpose of the System of Care Advisory Council is  to improve the effectiveness
and efficacy of state  and local systems of care that provide services to youth by providing a cen-
tralized and impartial forum for statewide policy development and planning.
(2) The primary duty of the council is to develop and maintain a state system of care policy  and
a comprehensive, long-range plan for a coordinated state system of care that encompasses  public
health, health systems, child welfare, education, juvenile justice and services and supports  for men-
tal and behavioral health and people with intellectual or developmental disabilities. The  plan must
include, but need not be limited to, recommendations regarding:
(a) Capacity, utilization and types of state and local systems of care and services and supports;
(b) Implementation of in-home behavioral health services, crisis and  transition services,
therapeutic foster care, in-home family support services  and the integration of those services with
existing programs of residential services  for individuals with behavioral health needs and intellec-
tual developmental disabilities;
(c) Appropriate use of existing systems of care and services and supports;
(d) Whether additional services and supports are necessary to address gaps in coverage;
(e) Methods for assessing the  effectiveness of systems of care and services and supports in re-
ducing juvenile dependency or delinquency;
(f) Methods of reducing risk of future juvenile dependency or delinquency;
(g) The effective utilization of the local system of care governance structure;
(h) Guidelines for partner agency core values and guiding principles; and
(i) Guidelines that ensure cultural competence in the provision of services and supports by:
(A) Implementing uniform standards to allow local system  of care teams to describe the cul-
turally responsive services and supports available in a system of care.
Enrolled Senate Bill 4 (SB 4-A) Page 3
(B) Providing youth and  families with understandable and effective system of care services in
a manner compatible with  their disabilities, cultural beliefs and practices, literacy skills and lan-
guage.
(C) Developing and implementing a process to review practices accepted by diverse communities.
(D) Identifying ways to continually improve culturally competent system of care  services and
implementing a statewide system of care that reflects culturally competent practices.
(3) Other duties of the council are to:
(a) Conduct joint studies  by agreement with other state agencies, boards or commissions on any
matter within the jurisdiction of the council;
(b) Provide oversight of the implementation of the services described in subsection  (2)(b) of this
section by the Oregon Health Authority, the  Oregon Youth Authority and the Department of Human
Services and to provide periodic updates on the agencies’ implementation to the Legislative Assem-
bly;
(c) Provide recommendations to the Director of the Oregon Health  Authority, the Director of
the Oregon  Youth Authority and the Director of Human Services as necessary for the agencies to
maintain and strengthen the systems of care;
(d) Make recommendations to the Director of the Oregon Health Authority, the Director of the
Oregon Youth Authority and the Director of  Human Services to reduce barriers to implementation
of systems of care;
(e) Continually monitor and update the Children’s System Data Dashboard described in  ORS
418.981, with a specific focus on the number of  youth placed in hotels, out-of-state placements,
emergency department boarding, congregate care facilities, shelter  care or Oregon Youth Authority
custody;  and
(f) Award grants from funds appropriated by the Legislative Assembly  to the council or
from funds otherwise available from  any other source,  for the purpose of supporting local sys-
tem of care governance and for carrying out  the recommendations in the council’s plan developed
under subsection (2) of this section.
(4)(a) On or before January 2 of each even-numbered year, the council shall update its plan un-
der subsection (2) of  this section and submit the plan to an interim committee of the Legislative
Assembly related to youth, and to the Governor.
(b) On or before September 15 of each year, the council  shall submit a report in the manner
provided in ORS 192.245[ , including recommendations for legislation, ] to an interim committee of the
Legislative Assembly related to youth,  and to the Governor, describing how the council is meeting
its goals[ , the ] and any remaining barriers to access to services and supports [ and]. The report
may include  recommendations for legislation , including recommendations for changes to the
council structure, composition and operating processes.
(c) On  or before December 31 of each odd-numbered year, the council, the Department
of Human Services and the Oregon Health Authority  shall submit a joint report in the
manner described in ORS 192.245 to an interim committee of the Legislative  Assembly re-
lated to youth, describing moneys appropriated to or otherwise made available to  the de-
partment, the authority or the council in the preceding biennium for the purpose of
providing, or providing access to, the services and  supports described in subsection (2)(b) of
this section. The report must include an accounting of the expenditures made by the de-
partment, the authority and the council and of any moneys remaining unspent at  the close
of the biennium .
(5) The council may:
(a) Apply for and receive gifts and grants from any public or private source.
(b) Submit proposals for legislative measures at  the time and in the manner prescribed
in ORS 171.130 and 171.133.
[(b)] (c)  Adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
(6) The council shall submit an agency request budget at the  time and in the manner
prescribed under ORS 291.208.
Enrolled Senate Bill 4 (SB 4-A) Page 4
[(6)] (7)(a)  All agencies of state government[ , as defined in ORS 174.111, ] are directed to assist
the council in the performance of the duties of the council and, to the extent permitted by laws re-
lating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice that the members of  the council consider
necessary to perform the duties of the council.
(b) At the council’s request, a participating state agency shall provide the council  with
the agency’s proposed budget form, prior to the agency’s submission of the  form to the
Oregon Department  of Administrative Services under ORS 291.208, for the council’s review.
The council may make recommendations to the agency  or, if appropriate, the department
regarding the agency’s proposed expenditures for services and supports necessary to imple-
ment the council’s policy recommendations under this section.
(8) The council and participating state agencies shall,  where applicable, enter into inter-
agency agreements to:
(a) Provide staff and resources to assist the council in carrying out the council’s duties;
(b) Share computer systems and technologies, to the extent allowed by law;
(c) Collect and  analyze data related to the state system of care and the performance of
the council’s duties; or
(d) Investigate the effectiveness of the council’s  proposals and recommendations under
this section.
(9) Moneys  that are appropriated to or otherwise made available to the council or the
Oregon Health Authority for the purpose of supporting the duties of the council may not  be
expended except as directed by the council.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 418.983 is amended to read:
418.983. (1) The System of Care Account is established in the State Treasury, separate and dis-
tinct from the General Fund. All moneys deposited in the account are continuously appropriated to
the Oregon Health Authority for the purpose of supporting the duties of the System of  Care Advi-
sory Council established under ORS 418.978, as directed by the council.
(2) The  authority may not expend moneys that are appropriated to or otherwise made
available to the authority under this section except as directed by the council.
SECTION 5.
The reports required under ORS  418.979 (4)(c) are first due December 31,
2021.
SECTION 6. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 4 (SB 4-A) Page 5
Passed by Senate June 21, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 25, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 4 (SB 4-A) Page 6